Alabama, session 2026rs, HB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
33 Section 1. Sections 41-9-590, 41-9-594, 41-9-625, and
34 41-9-650, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
35 follows:
36 "§41-9-590
37 When used in this article, the following terms shall
38 have the following meanings, respectively, unless the context
39 clearly indicates a different meaning:
40 (1) AJIC or COMMISSION. The Alabama Justice Information
41 Commission.
42 (2) ALEA. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
43 (3) ALEA CJIS. The Criminal Justice Information
44 Services Division of ALEA.
45 (4) BACKGROUND CHECK. A report produced by one or more
46 information systems within ALEA that identifies a specific
47 individual's criminal history record within the state criminal
48 history repository. The report may also include criminal
49 history record information from the national criminal history
50 repository maintained by the FBI or other public
51 safety-related information maintained or accessed through the
52 authority of ALEA.
53 (5) CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION. Information
54 collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals
55 consisting of identifiable descriptions, including
56 fingerprints and other biometric information, and notations of
Page 2

fingerprints and other biometric information, and notations of
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
57 arrests, detentions, indictments, or other formal charges, and
58 any disposition arising therefrom, including acquittal,
59 sentencing, correctional induction, supervision, or release.
60 The term does not include identification information such as
61 fingerprint records if the information does not indicate the
62 individual's involvement with the criminal justice system.
63 (3)(6) CRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCIES. Federal, state,
64 local, and tribal public agencies that perform substantial
65 activities or planning for activities relating to the
66 identification, apprehension, prosecution, adjudication, or
67 rehabilitation of civil, traffic, and criminal offenders.
68 (4)(7) CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION. Data necessary for
69 criminal justice Information based upon data under the
70 authority of ALEA or AJIC necessary for criminal justice and
71 public safety agencies to perform their duties and enforce
72 existing law missions. This term includes, but is not limited
73 to, biometrics, business, biometric, identity history, person,
74 organization, and property, when accompanied by any personally
75 identifiable information, bond conditions and provisions, an
76 individual's identity history data, biographic information,
77 case/incident case or incident history reportsdata, and any
78 other data deemed criminal justice information by the FBI CJIS
79 Security Policy. The term also includes ALEA-provided or FBI
80 CJIS-provided data necessary to make hiring decisions. In
81 addition, the term may refer to the ALEA CJIS-provided or FBI
82 CJIS-provided data necessary for civil agencies to perform
83 their missions, including, but not limited to, data used to
84 make hiring decisions.
Page 3

make hiring decisions.
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
85 (5)(8) CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION SERVICES DIVISION
86 or FBI CJIS. The division of the Federal Bureau of
87 Investigation that equips law enforcement, national security,
88 and intelligence community partners with needed criminal
89 justice information The Criminal Justice Information Services
90 Division of the FBI that is responsible for the collection,
91 warehousing, and timely dissemination of relevant criminal
92 justice information to the FBI and to qualified law
93 enforcement, criminal justice, civilian, academic, employment,
94 and licensing agencies.
95 (9) FBI. The Federal Bureau of Investigation.
96 (10) IDENTITY HISTORY DATA. Textual data that
97 corresponds with an individual's biometric data, providing a
98 history of criminal and civil events for the identified
99 individual.
100 (6)(11) INFORMATION SYSTEM. A system of people, data,
101 and processes, whether manual or automated, established for
102 the purpose of managing information.
103 (7)(12) NLETS. Network provider The national
104 organization that provides for the exchange of criminal
105 justice and public safety information among multiple between
106 state, federal, and international criminal justice and public
107 safety agencies.
108 (8)(13) NLETS SYSTEM AGENCY or NSA. The state agency
109 responsible for the administration of the NLETS network
110 information provided by NLETS to criminal justice and public
111 safety agencies within this state and who provides a
112 representative from the state for the governance of NLETS.
Page 4

representative from the state for the governance of NLETS.
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
113 (14) NONCRIMINAL JUSTICE PURPOSE. The uses of criminal
114 history records for purposes authorized by federal or state
115 law other than purposes relating to the administration of
116 criminal justice, including employment suitability, licensing
117 determinations, immigration and naturalization matters, and
118 national security clearances.
119 (9)(15) OFFENSE. Any act that is a felony, misdemeanor,
120 state violation, municipal ordinance violation, or violation,
121 or an act of delinquency.
122 (16) RAP BACK. A system that enables authorized
123 entities to receive ongoing status notifications of any
124 criminal history reported by ALEA or the FBI on individuals
125 whose fingerprints are registered in the ALEA CJIS biometric
126 identity repository or the FBI CJIS national fingerprint file.
127 (10)(17) SECRETARY. The Secretary of the Alabama State
128 Law Enforcement Agency.
129 (11) SBI. The State Bureau of Investigation.
130 (12)(18) USER AGENCY. Any agency or entity that
131 subscribes to, accesses, or views any ALEA information system
132 or service provided under the authority of this article."
133 "§41-9-594
134 (a) The commission shall establish its own adopt rules
135 and policies for the performance of the responsibilities
136 charged to it in under this article. Unless otherwise stated,
137 the rules of the commission are subject to the Administrative
138 Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of Title 41. ALEA may establish
139 procedures to implement the rules and policies of the
140 commission or as otherwise stated in state law.
Page 5

commission or as otherwise stated in state law.
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
141 (b) The commission shall establish adopt rules and
142 policies that will restrict the information obtained under
143 authority of this article to the items germane to the
144 implementation of this article and restrict the use of
145 information only to authorized persons and agencies.
146 (c) The chair of the commission shall appoint a Privacy
147 and Security Committee from the membership of the commission
148 who are elected officials, or their designees, consisting of a
149 chair and three members, to study the privacy and security
150 implications of sharing criminal justice information and to
151 formulate rule or policy recommendations for consideration by
152 the commission concerning the collection, storage,
153 dissemination, or usage of criminal justice information.
154 (d) The commission may adopt rules and policies
155 regarding the collection, storage, and dissemination of
156 criminal justice information that conform to the policies of
157 the FBI CJIS. The commission may adopt rules and policies that
158 permit ALEA to perform background checks for noncriminal
159 justice purposes and may provide for the procedure for
160 obtaining the records including, but not limited to, charging
161 a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for securing
162 records through ALEA. All fees shall be deposited into the
163 State Treasury to the credit of the Public Safety Fund and
164 shall be used to cover the expenses for improving criminal
165 history records and the state repository at ALEA.
166 (e) Any rule or policy of the commission to the
167 contrary notwithstanding, the police department of any college
168 or university in this state which offers medical, nursing, and
Page 6

or university in this state which offers medical, nursing, and
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
169 health care education, or which operates a hospital may
170 request from ALEA a criminal background check on any person
171 who applies for employment with the college or university, and
172 ALEA may charge a background search fee of up to twenty-five
173 dollars ($25) from each applicant for each search conducted on
174 the applicant. All fee proceeds from the background check fee
175 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the
176 Public Safety Fund and shall be used to cover expenses for
177 improving criminal history records and the state repository at
178 ALEA.
179 (e) The commission may direct ALEA CJIS to establish
180 procedures, manuals, documents, forms or requirements; perform
181 tasks to facilitate federal and state law; and perform tasks
182 to facilitate rules or policies established by the commission.
183 These directives and ALEA CJIS's subsequent response are not
184 subject to APA approval, but must be approved by the
185 commission.
186 (f) The Unless otherwise provided by law, the
187 commission may establish a fee schedule for any services
188 rendered by ALEA under the authority of this article. All fees
189 shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of
190 the Public Safety Fund and shall be used to support, develop,
191 maintain, and promote operations as authorized in this
192 article."
193 "§41-9-625
194 (a) All persons in this state in charge of law
195 enforcement and correctional agencies shall obtain biometric
196 identifiers, which may include fingerprints, photographs, palm
Page 7

identifiers, which may include fingerprints, photographs, palm
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
197 prints, retina scans, or other identifiers specified by the
198 FBI, according to the biometric identification system at ALEA
199 and the rules established by the commission of all persons
200 arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice, and
201 of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions. All
202 biometric identifiers collected according to this section
203 shall be provided to ALEA according to the rules of the
204 commission.
205 (b) If any person arrested or taken into custody is
206 subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense
207 through criminal justice proceedings, the disposition shall be
208 reported by all state, county, and municipal criminal justice
209 agencies to ALEA within 30 days of such action, and all of the
210 information shall be eliminated and removed.
211 (a) When an individual is arrested for an offense, the
212 arresting agency shall obtain biometric identifiers, which may
213 include fingerprints, photographs, palm prints, iris scans, or
214 other identifiers specified by rule of AJIC, and provide this
215 information to ALEA according to the procedures established by
216 ALEA CJIS for inclusion in the state biometric identification
217 repository.
218 (b) When an individual is detained or taken into
219 custody as a fugitive from justice, the agency with custody
220 over the individual may obtain biometric identifiers, which
221 may include fingerprints, photographs, palm prints, iris
222 scans, or other identifiers specified by AJIC rule and provide
223 the information according to the procedures established by
224 ALEA CJIS. If the individual is subsequently released without
Page 8

ALEA CJIS. If the individual is subsequently released without
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
225 charge, released to the jurisdiction of the underlying arrest,
226 or otherwise cleared of the charged offense through criminal
227 justice proceedings, the involved agency shall notify ALEA
228 CJIS of the disposition within 30 days. Upon receiving
229 notification, ALEA shall remove all information regarding the
230 detainment or custodial event from all ALEA CJIS information
231 systems.
232 (c) All agencies that recover an unidentified human
233 corpse shall obtain biometric identifiers and provide this
234 information and other recovery event-related information to
235 ALEA according to the rules established by the commission and
236 procedures established by ALEA CJIS for inclusion in the state
237 biometric identification repository.
238 (d)A law enforcement officer may use a biometric
239 identification device with access to the state and federal
240 biometric identification repositories to identify an
241 individual to the extent allowed by state law in situations
242 that provide the officer authority to request or otherwise
243 take action to identify an individual. The device must meet
244 FBI or AJIC standards to compare the captured identifier to
245 the state or federal biometric identification repositories.
246 The commission shall establish rules for the use of these
247 devices and the resulting information returned from the use."
248 "§41-9-650
249 In addition to any other requirements, any agency,
250 board, or commission in this state that issues a permit or
251 license, by rule, may require a criminal background check
252 through ALEA as part of its licensing or permitting
Page 9

through ALEA as part of its licensing or permitting
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
253 requirements. Any agency, board, or commission adopting a rule
254 requiring a background check shall be subject to rules and
255 procedures of the commission for the use of the background
256 check.
257 (a) ALEA shall establish and operate a service, to be
258 called the Alabama Background Check Service, that allows
259 authorized persons and entities to obtain background checks on
260 individuals for noncriminal justice purposes.
261 (b)(1) AJIC shall adopt rules for the operation and use
262 of the Alabama Background Check Service.
263 (2) ALEA CJIS shall establish procedures that are
264 consistent with the commission's rules.
265 (c) ALEA may contract with one or more vendors or other
266 third-party entities to facilitate any or all functions of the
267 service on behalf of ALEA."
268 Section 2. Sections 41-9-650.1, 41-9-650.2, 41-9-650.3,
269 41-9-650.4, and 41-9-650.5 are added to the Code of Alabama
270 1975, to read as follows:
271 §41-9-650.1
272 (a) For the noncriminal justice purposes specified
273 herein, ALEA may provide a background check to any of the
274 following persons or entities:
275 (1) Any public or private employer to screen a
276 prospective employee or contractor or for other employment
277 purposes.
278 (2) Any government agency, board, or commission with
279 legal authority to issue a license, permit, or certification
280 to screen an applicant for the issuance or renewal of the
Page 10

to screen an applicant for the issuance or renewal of the
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
281 license, permit, or certification.
282 (3) Any nonprofit or volunteer organization to screen a
283 prospective or current volunteer of the organization.
284 (4) Any housing authority or lessor of rental property
285 to screen a prospective or current resident.
286 (5) Any educational entity to screen student
287 applicants, prospective or current volunteers involved with
288 entity-related activities, or other individuals directly
289 related to the operations or events of the entity and subject
290 to the entity's authority.
291 (6) Any agency or organization established by federal
292 or state law for an official purpose of the agency or
293 organization.
294 (7) Any person or entity authorized by the rules of the
295 commission to obtain a background check for noncriminal
296 justice purposes.
297 (b) Except as otherwise provided by law, an individual
298 who is the subject of a background check for noncriminal
299 justice purposes shall provide express permission for the
300 release of information to the authorized person or entity
301 requesting the check prior to ALEA's dissemination of
302 background check information. The subject's express permission
303 shall be maintained, physically or digitally, by the
304 requesting person or entity for a period of three years or for
305 the term of the subject's association with the requester,
306 whichever is longer.
307 (c) A background check may not be provided on any
308 individual under 18 years of age without parental consent.
Page 11

individual under 18 years of age without parental consent.
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
309 (d) Any person or entity that is authorized by state
310 law to perform a background check or allowed by law to adopt
311 rules requiring a background check is subject to the AJIC
312 rules and ALEA procedures described in Section 41-9-650.
313 (e) The commission may require a person or entity to
314 develop background check guidelines for the commission's
315 review and approval prior to allowing the release of
316 background check information to that person or entity.
317 (f) Background check information may only be
318 disseminated for the specific purposes listed in this section.
319 No person or entity that has received background check
320 information from ALEA shall subsequently disseminate the
321 background check information to any other person or entity.
322 (g) Any recipient of a background check record may be
323 subject to an audit by ALEA CJIS.
324 §41-9-650.2
325 (a) The Alabama Background Check Service may be
326 provided through a biometric-based or a name-based search for
327 a background check record.
328 (b) A name-based search shall be initiated by
329 submitting an individual's name to ALEA through an Internet
330 web portal or other commission-approved mechanism, which shall
331 allow for the electronic transfer of records and shall only
332 return state information results.
333 (c) The response to a biometric-based search shall only
334 be provided upon the receipt of biometric information by ALEA
335 or a commission-approved third-party entity acting on behalf
336 of ALEA that meets all FBI standards for biometric
Page 12

of ALEA that meets all FBI standards for biometric
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
337 identification collection. This search shall provide state
338 information results, as well as other state and federal
339 information as allowed by law.
340 (d) An applicant for a license, permit, or
341 certification shall provide the issuing government agency,
342 board, or commission with his or her name, date of birth,
343 Social Security number, and express permission for the release
344 of information on a form sworn by the applicant. This
345 information shall be digitally provided to ALEA. If a
346 biometric-based check is requested, the applicant shall submit
347 fingerprints or other biometrics in accordance with AJIC rules
348 and ALEA CJIS procedures. If a national record check is
349 required, ALEA shall forward or process the applicant's prints
350 or other biometrics to the FBI for a national criminal
351 background check in a manner consistent with federal law.
352 §41-9-650.3
353 (a) The secretary may establish reasonable record fees
354 for the provision of a background check report, not to exceed
355 thirty dollars ($30). The record fee may be waived at the
356 discretion of the secretary.
357 (b) Additional costs may be assessed to a person or
358 entity requesting a background check for any of the following:
359 (1) The cost for a national criminal background check,
360 as determined by the FBI.
361 (2) Financial transaction fees.
362 (3) A reasonable one-time account registration fee.
363 (c) ALEA may enter into an agreement with one or more
364 vendors or other third-party entities to perform background
Page 13

vendors or other third-party entities to perform background
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
365 check services for ALEA on the basis of fee sharing or by
366 adding an additional convenience fee for third-party services.
367 (d) Requests for background checks made by the Alabama
368 Peace Officers' Standards and Training Commission or by any
369 criminal justice agency are exempt from fees established
370 pursuant to this section if the request is made for criminal
371 justice purposes or for the purpose of making an employment
372 suitability decision.
373 (e) All monies received for background checks shall be
374 deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Public
375 Safety Fund. The monies shall be used for the purposes of ALEA
376 CJIS and for other ALEA expenses as determined by the
377 secretary.
378 §41-9-650.4
379 (a) As part of the Alabama Background Check Service,
380 ALEA may establish the Alabama Rap Back Program. If
381 established, ALEA shall participate in the FBI's Next
382 Generation Identification (NGI) Rap Back Service. The purpose
383 of the rap back service is to allow ALEA to notify
384 participating entities when an enrolled individual is the
385 subject of a rap back notification event, including, but not
386 limited to, being arrested for or convicted of an offense.
387 (b) As used in this section, the following words have
388 the following meanings:
389 (1) INDIVIDUAL. Any individual who has undergone a
390 fingerprint-based background check in order to care for
391 children, the disabled, or the elderly, or to be licensed,
392 certified, or to perform volunteer service, or for any other
Page 14

certified, or to perform volunteer service, or for any other
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
393 FBI or federally authorized purpose with a participating
394 entity and who has been enrolled by that participating entity
395 in the Alabama Rap Back Program.
396 (2) PARTICIPATING ENTITY. An entity with statutory
397 authority to require an individual to undergo a
398 fingerprint-based background check as a condition to care for
399 children, the disabled, or the elderly, or to be licensed,
400 certified, or to perform volunteer service, or for any other
401 FBI or federally authorized purpose and has elected to enroll
402 those individuals in the Alabama Rap Back Program.
403 (c) ALEA may submit fingerprints and accompanying
404 records to the FBI to be retained in and advised through the
405 FBI's NGI Rap Back Service when an enrolled individual is
406 arrested for or convicted of a criminal offense. Fingerprints
407 submitted to the FBI may be used for future searches,
408 including latent searches.
409 (d) ALEA shall ensure that notification is made to the
410 participating entity that enrolls an individual in the Alabama
411 Rap Back Program when an FBI Rap Back report notification is
412 received. The information contained in the notification shall
413 be used by the participating entity for purposes of
414 determining the eligibility of the continued service of the
415 individual and shall not be further disseminated.
416 (e) ALEA shall adopt rules governing the operation and
417 maintenance of the Alabama Rap Back Program and the removal
418 and destruction of records on individuals who are deceased or
419 who are no longer individuals as defined in this section. Such
420 rules shall provide that a participating entity shall
Page 15

rules shall provide that a participating entity shall
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
421 disenroll any individual who is deceased or is no longer an
422 individual as defined in this section within five business
423 days of death or such event that no longer requires the
424 individual to be enrolled in the Alabama Rap Back Program to
425 ensure the prompt removal and destruction of records from the
426 Alabama Rap Back Program.
427 (f) ALEA may assess an annual fee not to exceed twelve
428 dollars ($12) per individual enrolled in the Alabama Rap Back
429 Program. The fee shall be paid by the participating entity
430 enrolling an individual in the Alabama Rap Back Program. When
431 more than one participating entity enrolls the same individual
432 in the Alabama Rap Back Program, both participating entities
433 shall be responsible for paying the full cost for maintenance
434 and notification. Any fees collected shall be deposited in the
435 State Treasury to the credit of the Public Safety Fund. Such
436 monies shall be used for the purposes of ALEA CJIS and for
437 other ALEA expenses as determined by the secretary.
438 (g) No participating entity authorized to submit
439 fingerprints shall be considered negligent per se in a civil
440 action solely because the entity elected not to enroll an
441 individual in the Alabama Rap Back Program pursuant to this
442 section.
443 (h) ALEA may establish an in-state rap back service for
444 any person or entity that does not qualify to receive
445 information from the FBI Rap Back Service but that has
446 authority to require a state-only background check.
447 §41-9-650.5
448 (a) An individual commits the crime of misuse of a
Page 16

(a) An individual commits the crime of misuse of a
2JVBEKK-1 01/14/2026 GED (H) HSE 2025-3139
House Judiciary Reported Substitute for HB100
449 background check report if he or she does any of the
450 following:
451 (1) Knowingly receives, disseminates, or otherwise uses
452 a background check contrary to the purposes allowed by this
453 article or otherwise allowed in law.
454 (2) Performs a background check on an individual
455 without first receiving a release, when required, from the
456 subject of the report.
457 (3) Willfully uses information submitted to the Alabama
458 Rap Back Program for purposes not authorized in this article
459 with the intent to harass or intimidate another individual.
460 (b) Misuse of a background check report is a Class B
461 misdemeanor.
462 Section 3. Article 4 of Chapter 2 of Title 32, Code of
463 Alabama 1975, relating to the release of criminal history
464 information, is repealed.
465 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
466 1, 2026.
Page 17